North Dakota, session 69, SB2291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 23-12-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Informed consent for health care for a minor patient or a patient who is determined by a
physician, psychiatrist, or psychologist to be an incapacitated person, as defined in subsection
2 of section 30.1-26-01 30.1 - 01 - 06 , and unable to consent may be obtained from a person
authorized to consent on behalf of the patient. Persons in the following classes and in the
following order of priority may provide informed consent to health care on behalf of the patient:
a. The individual, if any, to whom the patient has given a durable power of attorney that
encompasses the authority to make health care decisions, unless a court of competent
jurisdiction specifically authorizes a guardian to make medical decisions for the
incapacitated person;
b. The appointed guardian or custodian of the patient, if any;
c. The patient's spouse who has maintained significant contacts with the incapacitated
person;
d. Children of the patient who are at least eighteen years of age and who have maintained
significant contacts with the incapacitated person;
e. Parents of the patient, including a stepparent who has maintained significant contacts
with the incapacitated person;
f. Adult brothers and sisters of the patient who have maintained significant contacts with
the incapacitated person;
g. Grandparents of the patient who have maintained significant contacts with the
incapacitated person;

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 2
h. Grandchildren of the patient who are at least eighteen years of age and who have
maintained significant contacts with the incapacitated person; or
i. A close relative or friend of the patient who is at least eighteen years of age and who has
maintained significant contacts with the incapacitated person.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 25-03.1-18.1 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. a. Upon notice and hearing, a tier 1b mental health professional may request authorization
from the court to treat an individual under a mental health treatment order, or an
individual voluntarily admitted to a public treatment facility under section 25 - 03.1 - 04 , with
prescribed medication. The request may be considered by the court in an involuntary
treatment hearing. As a part of the request, a psychiatrist or a final year psychiatric
resident physician not involved in the current diagnosis or treatment of the patient shall
certify:
(1) That the proposed prescribed medication is clinically appropriate and necessary to
effectively treat the patient and that the patient is a person requiring treatment;
(2) That the patient was offered that treatment and refused it or that the patient lacks
the capacity to make or communicate a responsible decision about that treatment;
(3) That prescribed medication is the least restrictive form of intervention necessary to
meet the treatment needs of the patient; and
(4) That the benefits of the treatment outweigh the known risks to the patient.
b. The court shall inquire whether the patient has had a sufficient opportunity to adequately
prepare to meet the issue of involuntary treatment with prescribed medication and, at the
request of the patient, the court may continue the involuntary treatment hearing for a
period not exceeding seven days or may appoint an independent expert examiner as
provided in subsection 4.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 27-20.1-17 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. An order appointing or reappointing a guardian under this chapter is effective for up to one
year unless the court, upon a finding of good cause, sets a different time frame. An order may
not be effective for more than three years. At least sixty days before the expiration of the initial
order of appointment or any following order of reappointment, the court shall request and
consider information submitted by the guardian, the child, if fourteen years of age or older, the
child's attorney, if any, the child's parents, and any interested persons regarding whether the
need for a guardianship continues to exist. The court, at its discretion, may appoint a guardian
ad litem in accordance with section 27-20.1-08, before the hearing. The court shall hold a
hearing on whether the guardianship should continue. Following the hearing and consideration
of submitted information, the court may:
a. Terminate the guardianship if shown by clear and convincing evidence that the
circumstances that led to the guardianship no longer exist;
b. Reappoint the guardian for up to three years; or
c. Appoint a new guardian.
The court may extend a guardianship up to ninety days past the expiration of the initial order,
for good cause shown, if the hearing cannot be held before the expiration of the order. If the
court extends an initial order for guardianship, new letters of guardianship must be issued
reflecting the extended expiration date.

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 3
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-01-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
30.1-01-06. (1-201) General definitions.
Subject to additional definitions contained in the subsequent chapters which are applicable to
specific chapters, and unless the context otherwise requires, in this title:
1. "Agent" includes an attorney-in-fact under a durable or nondurable power of attorney, an
individual authorized to make decisions concerning another's health care, and an individual
authorized to make decisions for another under a natural death act.
2. "Alternative resource plan" means an alternative plan to guardianship which uses available
support services and arrangements acceptable to the alleged incapacitated person. The term
includes the use of support services such as visiting nurses, homemakers, home health aides,
personal care attendants, adult day care, home and community-based care, human service
zones, developmental disability services, powers of attorney, durable powers of attorney,
health care directives, supported decisionmaking, representative and protective payees, and
licensed congregate care facilities.
3. "Application" means a written request to the court for an order of informal probate or
appointment under chapter 30.1-14.
3.4. "Augmented estate" means the estate described in section 30.1-05-02.
4.5. "Beneficiary", as it relates to a trust beneficiary, includes a person who has any present or
future interest, vested or contingent, and also includes the owner of an interest by assignment
or other transfer; as it relates to a charitable trust, includes any person entitled to enforce the
trust; as it relates to a beneficiary of a beneficiary designation, refers to a beneficiary of an
account with a payable on death designation, of a security registered in beneficiary form
transferable on death, or other nonprobate transfer at death; and, as it relates to a "beneficiary
designated in a governing instrument", includes a grantee of a deed, a devisee, a trust
beneficiary, a beneficiary of a beneficiary designation, a donee, or a person in whose favor a
power of attorney or a power held in any individual, fiduciary, or representative capacity is
exercised.
5.6. "Beneficiary designation" refers to a governing instrument naming a beneficiary of an account
with payable on death designation, of a security registered in beneficiary form transferable on
death, or other nonprobate transfer at death.
6.7. "Child" includes an individual entitled to take as a child under this title by intestate succession
from the parent whose relationship is involved and excludes a person who is only a stepchild,
a foster child, a grandchild, or any more remote descendant.
7.8. "Claims", in respect to estates of decedents and protected persons, includes liabilities of the
decedent or protected person whether arising in contract, in tort, or otherwise, and liabilities of
the estate which arise at or after the death of the decedent or after the appointment of a
conservator, including funeral expenses and expenses of administration. The term does not
include estate or inheritance taxes or demands or disputes regarding title of a decedent or
protected person to specific assets alleged to be included in the estate.
8.9. "Conservator" means a person who is appointed by a court to manage the estate of a
protected person, and includes limited conservators as defined in this section.
9.10. "Court" means the court having jurisdiction in matters relating to the affairs of decedents.

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 4
10.11. "Descendant" of an individual means all descendants of all generations, with the relationship
of parent and child at each generation being determined by the definition of child and parent
contained in this title.
11.12. "Devise", when used as a noun, means a testamentary disposition of real or personal
property, and when used as a verb, means to dispose of real or personal property by will.
12.13. "Devisee" means a person designated in a will to receive a devise. In the case of a devise to
an existing trust or trustee, or to a trustee or trust described by will, the trust or trustee is the
devisee and the beneficiaries are not devisees.
13.14. "Disability" means cause for a protective order as described in section 30.1-29-01.
14.15. "Distributee" means any person who has received property of a decedent from the decedent's
personal representative other than as a creditor or purchaser. A testamentary trustee is a
distributee only to the extent of distributed assets or increment thereto remaining in the
trustee's hands. A beneficiary of a testamentary trust to whom the trustee has distributed
property received from a personal representative is a distributee of the personal
representative. For the purposes of this provision, "testamentary trustee" includes a trustee to
whom assets are transferred by will to the extent of the devised assets.
15.16. "Estate" includes the property of the decedent, trust, or other person whose affairs are subject
to this title as originally constituted and as it exists from time to time during administration.
16.17. "Exempt property" means that property of a decedent's estate which is described in section
30.1-07-01.
17.18. "Expert examiner" means:
a. A licensed physician;
b. A psychiatrist;
c. A licensed psychologist trained in a clinical program;
d. An advanced practice registered nurse who is licensed under chapter 43-12.1 within the
role of a certified nurse practitioner or certified clinical nurse specialist, who has
completed the requirements for a minimum of a master's degree from an accredited
program, and who is functioning within the scope of practice in one of the population foci
as approved by the state board of nursing; or
e. A physician assistant who is licensed under chapter 43-17 and authorized by the state
board of medical examiners to practice in this state.
18.19. "Fiduciary" includes a personal representative, guardian, conservator, and trustee.
19.20. "Foreign personal representative" means a personal representative appointed by another
jurisdiction.
20.21. "Formal proceedings" means proceedings conducted before a judge with notice to interested
persons.
21.22. "Governing instrument" means a deed, will, trust, insurance or annuity policy, account with
payable on death designation, security registered in beneficiary form transferable on death,
pension, profit-sharing, retirement, or similar benefit plan, instrument creating or exercising a
power of appointment or a power of attorney, or a dispositive, appointive, or nominative
instrument of any similar type.

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 5
22.23. "Guardian" means a person who or nonprofit corporation that has qualified as a guardian of a
minor or incapacitated person pursuant to testamentary or court appointment, and includes
limited guardians as defined in this section, but excludes one who is merely a guardian ad
litem.
23.24. "Heirs", except as controlled by section 30.1-09.1-11, means persons, including the surviving
spouse and the state, who are entitled under the statutes of intestate succession to the
property of a decedent.
24.25. "Incapacitated person" means an individual described in section 30.1-26-01any adult
individual who is impaired by reason of mental illness, mental deficiency, physical illness or
disability, or chemical dependency to the extent that the individual lacks capacity to make or
communicate responsible decisions concerning the individual's matters of residence,
education, medical treatment, legal affairs, vocation, finance, or other matters, or if the
incapacity endangers the individual's health or safety.
25.26. "Informal proceedings" means those conducted by the court for probate of a will or
appointment of a personal representative without notice to interested persons.
26.27. "Interested person" includes heirs,:
a. Except as provided under section b :
(1) Heirs and devisees, children, spouses, creditors, beneficiaries, and any others;
(2) Children;
(3) Spouses:
(4) Creditors;
(5) Beneficiaries;
(6) Any individual having a property right in or claim against a trust estate or the estate
of a decedent, ward, or protected person. The term also includes persons;
(7) Person having priority for appointment as personal representative; and other
(8) Other fiduciaries representing interested persons.
b. For purposes of guardianships and conservatorships:
(1) The petitioner for appointment of the guardian;
(2) The spouse, parent, adult children, or siblings of the ward, protected person, or an
adult relative if a spouse, parent, adult child, sibling, or protected person cannot be
found;
(3) An adult individual who has lived with a ward or a protected person for a period of
more than six months;
(4) An attorney for the ward or protected person;
(5) A representative payee for the ward or protected person; and
(6) Any other person designated by the court.
The meaning as it relates to particular persons may vary from time to time and must be
determined according to the particular purposes of, and matter involved in, any proceeding.

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 6
27.28. "Issue" of a personan individual means descendant as defined in subsection 1011.
28.29. "Joint tenants with the right of survivorship" and "community property with the right of
survivorship" includes co-owners of property held under circumstances that entitle one or
more to the whole of the property on the death of the other or others, but excludes forms of
co-ownership registration in which the underlying ownership of each party is in proportion to
that party's contribution.
29.30. "Lease" includes an oil, gas, or other mineral lease.
30.31. "Least restrictive form of intervention" includes only the limitations necessary to provide the
needed care and services for a guardianship, and the ward must enjoy the greatest amount of
personal freedom and civil liberties consistent with the ward's mental and physical limitations.
32. "Letters" includes letters testamentary, letters of guardianship, letters of administration, and
letters of conservatorship.
31.33. "Limited conservator" means a person or nonprofit corporation, appointed by the court, to
manage only those financial resources specifically enumerated by the court for the person
with limited capacity and includes limited conservators as described by section 30.1-29-20.
32.34. "Limited guardian" means a person or nonprofit corporation, appointed by the court, to
supervise certain specified aspects of the care of a person with limited capacity and includes
limited guardians as described by section 30.1-28-04.
33.35. "Minor" means a person who is under eighteen years of age.
34.36. "Mortgage" means any conveyance, agreement, or arrangement in which property is
encumbered or used as security.
35.37. "Nonresident decedent" means a decedent who was domiciled in another jurisdiction at the
time of death.
36.38. "Organization" means a corporation, limited liability company, government or governmental
subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, joint venture, association, or
any other legal or commercial entity.
37.39. "Parent" includes any personindividual entitled to take, or who would be entitled to take if the
child died without a will, as a parent under this title, by intestate succession from the child
whose relationship is in question and excludes any person who is only a stepparent, foster
parent, or grandparent.
38.40. "Payer" means a trustee, insurer, business entity, employer, government, governmental
agency or subdivision, or any other person authorized or obligated by law or a governing
instrument to make payments.
39.41. "Person" means an individual, a corporation, a limited liability company, an organization, or
other legal entity.
40. "Person with limited capacity" is as defined in section 30.1-26-01.
41.42. "Personal representative" includes executor, administrator, successor personal representative,
special administrator, and persons who perform substantially the same function under the law
governing their status. "General personal representative" excludes special administrator.
42.43. "Petition" means a written request to the court for an order after notice.
43.44. "Proceeding" includes action at law and suit in equity.

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 7
44.45. "Property" includes both real and personal property or any interest therein and means
anything that may be the subject of ownership.
45.46. "Protected person" is as defined in section 30.1-26-01means a minor or other individual for
whom a conservator or limited conservator has been appointed, or other protective order has
been made.
46.47. "Protective proceeding" means a proceeding described in section 30.1-26-01under section
30.1 - 29 - 01 to determine that an individual cannot effectively manage or apply the individual's
estate to necessary ends, either because the individual lacks the ability or is otherwise
inconvenienced, or because the individual is a minor, and to secure administration of the
individual's estate by a conservator or other appropriate relief.
47.48. "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an
electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.
48.49. "Refusal" means declining to accept prescribed mood stabilizer or antipsychotic medication by
a clear and unequivocal response.
50. "Security" includes any note, stock, treasury stock, bond, debenture, membership interest in a
limited liability company, evidence of indebtedness, certificate of interest or participation in an
oil, gas, or mining title or lease or in payments out of production under such a title or lease,
collateral trust certificate, transferable share, voting trust certificate or, in general, any interest
or instrument commonly known as a security, or any certificate of interest or participation, any
temporary or interim certificate, receipt, or certificate of deposit for, or any warrant or right to
subscribe to or purchase, any of the foregoing.
49.51. "Settlement", in reference to a decedent's estate, includes the full process of administration,
distribution, and closing.
50.52. "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record other than a will, to
execute or adopt a tangible symbol or to attach to or logically associate with the record an
electronic symbol, sound, or process.
51.53. "Special administrator" means a personal representative as described by sections 30.1-17-14
through 30.1-17-18.
52.54. "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of
Puerto Rico, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United
States.
53.55. "Successor personal representative" means a personal representative, other than a special
administrator, who is appointed to succeed a previously appointed personal representative.
54.56. "Successors" means persons, other than creditors, who are entitled to property of a decedent
under the decedent's will or this title.
55.57. "Supervised administration" refers to the proceedings described in chapter 30.1-16.
56.58. "Survive" means that an individual has neither predeceased an event, including the death of
another individual, nor predeceased an event under sections 30.1-04-04 and 30.1-09.1-02.
The term includes its derivatives, such as "survives", "survived", "survivor", and "surviving".
57.59. "Testacy proceeding" means a proceeding to establish a will or determine intestacy.
58.60. "Trust" includes an express trust, private or charitable, with additions thereto, wherever and
however created. The term also includes a trust created or determined by judgment or decree
under which the trust is to be administered in the manner of an express trust. The term
excludes other constructive trusts and excludes resulting trusts, conservatorships, personal

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 8
representatives, trust accounts as defined in custodial arrangements pursuant to chapter
11-22, chapter 12-48, sections 25-01.1-19 to 25-01.1-21, chapter 32-10, section 32-16-37,
chapter 32-26, former chapter 47-24, chapter 47-24.1, business trusts providing for certificates
to be issued to beneficiaries, common trust funds, voting trusts, security arrangements,
liquidation trusts, and trusts for the primary purpose of paying debts, dividends, interest,
salaries, wages, profits, pensions, or employee benefits of any kind, and any arrangement
under which a person is nominee or escrowee for another.
59.61. "Trustee" includes an original, additional, or successor trustee, whether or not appointed or
confirmed by court.
60.62. "Visitor" means an individual, in guardianship proceedings, who is trained in nursing, social
work, medical care, mental health care, or rehabilitation and is an employee or special
appointee of the court with no personal interest in the proceedings.
61.63. "Ward" means an individual described in section 30.1-26-01for whom a guardian has been
appointed. A "minor ward" is a minor for whom a guardian has been appointed solely because
of minority.
62.64. "Will" includes codicil and any testamentary instrument that merely appoints an executor,
revokes or revises another will, nominates a guardian, or expressly excludes or limits the right
of an individual or class to succeed to property of the decedent passing by intestate
succession.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-28-03.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
30.1-28-03.1. Confidentiality - Reports - Personal information.
1. A written report prepared and submitted under subsection 5 or 6 of section 30.1-28-03 isby a
guardian ad litem, visitor, or expert examiner and annual and final reports and financial
accounting prepared and submitted by a guardian are closed to the public and isare not open
to inspection except by the court, parties to the proceeding or their counsel, other persons for
those purposes as the court may order for good cause, and others authorized by court rule.
2. Medical, psychological, or other treatment information protected by federal law or regulation
and any financial account numbers related to a ward or proposed ward are confidential and
may not be disclosed except to parties to the proceeding, their counsel, and others authorized
by court rule. The court may permit access by other persons for good cause.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 30.1-28-03.2 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. The motion must be served upon the ward, the ward's spouse, and all interested
persons those identified in section 12 of this Ac t.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-28-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
30.1-28-04. (5-304) Findings - Order of appointment.
1. The court shall exercise the authority conferred in this chapter consistent with the maximum
self-reliance and independence of the incapacitated person and make appointive and other
orders only to the extent necessitated by the incapacitated person's actual mental and
adaptive limitations or other conditions warranting the procedure.
2. At a hearing held under this chapter, the court shall:

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 9
a. Hear evidence that the proposed ward is an incapacitated person. Age, eccentricity,
poverty, or medical diagnosis alone is not sufficient to justify a finding of incapacity;
b. Hear evidence and determine whether there are any existing general durable powers of
attorney and durable powers of attorney for health care. If there are validly executed
durable powers of attorney, the court shall consider the appointed attorneys in fact and
agents appointed thereunder when assessing alternative resource plans and the need for
a guardian; and
c. Appoint a guardian and confer specific powers of guardianship only after finding in the
record based on clear and convincing evidence that:
(1) The proposed ward is an incapacitated person;
(2) There is no available alternative resource plan that is suitable to safeguard the
proposed ward's health, safety, or habilitation which could be used instead of a
guardianship;
(3) The guardianship is necessary as the best means of providing care, supervision, or
habilitation of the ward; and
(4) The powers and duties conferred upon the guardian are appropriate as the least
restrictive form of intervention consistent with the ability of the ward for self-care.
3. Except upon specific findings of the court, a ward may not be deprived of any of the following
legal rights: to vote, to seek to change marital status, or to obtain or retain a motor vehicle
operator's license.
4. The court may find that the ward retains other specific rights.
5. The order appointing a guardian confers upon the guardian only those powers and duties
specified in the order. In addition to any other powers conferred upon the guardian, the court's
order must state whether the guardian has no authority, general authority, or limited authority
to make decisions on behalf of the ward in each of the areas of residential, educational,
medical, legal, vocational, and financial decisionmaking. A grant of limited authority must
specify the limitations upon the authority of the guardian or the authority retained by the ward.
The court's order must require the guardian to provide within ninety days from the date of the
order a beginning inventory of all assets owned by the ward or in which the ward has an
interest. The guardian shall provide a copy of the beginning inventory to the ward and any
interested persons designated by the court in its order those identified in section 12 of this Ac t.
Unless terminated earlier by the court, an order appointing or reappointing a guardian under
this section is effective for up to five years. At least ninety days before the expiration of the
initial order of appointment or any following order of reappointment, the court shall request and
consider information submitted by the guardian, ward, ward's attorney, if any, and any
interested persons regarding whether the need for a guardian continues to exist. If it is
recommended that the guardianship continue, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem or,
visitor, or bothall, in accordance with section 30.1-28-03. The court shall hold a hearing on
whether the guardianship should continue. Following the hearing and consideration of
submitted information, the court may reappoint the guardian for up to another five years, allow
the existing order to expire, or appoint a new guardian in accordance with this section. If a
review hearing cannot be held before the expiration of an initial order for guardianship, the
court may extend the initial order for up to an additional ninety days upon good cause shown.
New letters of guardianship must be issued reflecting the extended expiration date. The
supreme court, by rule or order, shall provide for the regular review of guardianship in
existence on August 1, 2015.

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 10
6. Unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise, a durable power of attorney for
health care executed pursuant to chapter 23-06.5 takes precedence over any authority to
make medical decisions granted to a guardian pursuant to chapter 30.1-28.
7. The court may require a guardian to furnish a bond in the amount and with sureties as the
court specifies.
8. After the hearing, the guardian ad litem, visitor, and expert examiner must be discharged of
the person'stheir duties as guardian ad litem.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 30.1-28-05 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. By accepting appointment, a guardian submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any
proceeding relating to the guardianship that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice
of any proceeding so instituted must be served upon the guardian by the petitioner.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-28-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
30.1-28-07. (5-307) Removal or resignation of guardian - Change in or termination of
guardianship.
1. On petition of the ward or any person interested in the ward's welfare, the court may remove a
guardian and appoint a successor if in the best interests of the ward. On petition of the
guardian, the court may accept the guardian's resignation and make any other order which
may be appropriate.
2. The ward or any person interested in the ward's welfare may petition for an order that the
ward is no longer incapacitated or no longer incapacitated to the same extent as the ward was
when the original guardianship order was made or last reviewed by the court, or that the
duties and authority of the guardian require modification, and for removal or resignation of the
guardian, termination of the guardianship, or change in the duties and authority of the
guardian. A request for this order may be made by informal letter to the court or judge. The
clerk of district court shall send a copy of the informal request to the parties and those
identified in section 12 of this Act . Any person who knowingly interferes with transmission of
this kind of request to the court or judge may be adjudged guilty of contempt of court.
3.2. Before removing a guardian, changing the guardian's duties and authority, accepting the
resignation of a guardian, or on finding that the ward is no longer incapacitated, or no longer
incapacitated to the same extent and ordering the guardianship terminated or modified, the
court, following the same procedures to safeguard the rights of the ward as apply to a petition
for appointment of a guardian, may send a visitor to the place where the ward resides or is
detained, to observe conditions and report in writing to the court.
4.3. A hearing must be held no later than sixty days following the filing of the petition or informal
request, unless good cause is shown. Following the hearing, the court shall make written
findings of fact. Before terminating or modifying the guardianship, the court shall find by a
preponderance of the evidence that the ward is no longer incapacitated, no longer
incapacitated to the same extent as the ward was when the original guardianship order was
made or last reviewed by the court, or that it is in the best interests of the ward that the duties
and authority of the guardian be modified. New letters of guardianship must be issued to the
guardian in the same manner as provided in section 30.1-28-05.
5.4. In deciding whether to terminate or modify a guardianship, the court may require a report by
and consider the recommendations of an expert examiner.

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 11
6. If the guardian dies, or if on the basis of a petition filed under this section or a report or other
information, there is probable cause to believe a guardian is not performing the guardian's
duties effectively and there is an imminent danger the ward's physical, mental, or emotional
health or safety will be seriously impaired, the court shall take whatever action is necessary to
protect the ward, including dismissal of the guardian and appointment of an emergency
guardian as provided in section 30.1-28-10.1.
7.5. On termination of the guardianship, a guardian shall file a final report and accounting and
provide a copy of the report and accounting to those given notice under section 30.1-28-0912
of this Act. The report and accounting must be filed with the clerk of district court. The filing of
the report and accounting does not constitute the court's approval of the report and
accounting. The court may approve a report and settle and allow an accounting only upon
notice to the ward and other interested persons who have made an appearance or requested
notice of the proceedings to those identified in section 12 of this Ac t.
SECTION 10. A new section to chapter 30.1-28 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Removal, resignation, or death of guardian - Appointment of successor guardian.
1. The court may remove a guardian on its own motion or on petition of the ward or any
interested person if removal is in the best interests of the ward. A request for this order may be
made by informal letter to the court or judge. The clerk of district court shall send a copy of the
informal request to the parties and those identified in section 12 of this Act. Any person tha t
knowingly interferes with the transmission of a request under this section may be adjudged
guilty of contempt of court.
2. The court may accept the resignation of a guardian upon petition by the guardian.
3. Upon the death of a guardian, the personal representative of the guardian shall submit a final
report and accounting to the court. Upon removal or resignation of the guardian, the guardian
shall submit a final report and accounting to the court. The report and accounting must be filed
with the clerk of district court. The filing of the report and accounting does not constitute the
court's approval of the report and accounting. The court may approve a report and settle and
allow an accounting only upon notice to those identified in section 12 of this Act .
4. A hearing must be held no later than sixty days following the filing of the petition or informal
request, unless good cause is shown. Following the hearing, the court shall make written
findings of fact and conclusions of law.
5. Upon the removal, resignation, or death of a guardian, the court, upon the court's own motion
or upon a motion filed by any interested person, may appoint a successor guardian or make
any other appropriate order.
6. A notice of motion must accompany the motion for appointment of successor guardian and
must include a statement that provides an opportunity for hearing if requested in regard to the
appointment of a successor guardian. The notice of motion and motion must be served on
those identified in section 12 of this Act .
7. If a hearing is not requested by or on behalf of the ward listed in the notice, the court may sign
an order appointing a successor guardian for that ward.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 30.1-28-09 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. In a proceeding for the appointment or removal of a guardian or for an alteration or termination
of a guardianship other thanand, if notice is required, for the appointment of an emergency

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 12
guardian or for the temporary suspension of a guardian, notice of hearing shall be given by the
petitioning party, unless otherwise directed by the court, to each of the following:
a. The ward or the proposed ward and the ward's or proposed ward's spouse, parents, and
adult children;
b. Any person, corporation, or institution who is serving as the ward's guardian, attorney in
fact, representative payee for public benefits, or conservator, or who has the ward's care
and custody;
c. If no other person is notified under subdivision a, then the adult siblings and any adult
with whom the proposed ward resides in a private residence, or if none can be found,
any known adult relative; and
d. The attorney for the proposed ward, the visitor, and the expert examiner, together with a
copy of the respective order of appointment for each.
SECTION 12. A new section to chapter 30.1-28 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Notices in guardianship proceedings subsequent to appointment.
Notice in a guardianship proceeding subsequent to appointment of a guardian must be given to the
parties, the conservator, if any, the ward, and any interested persons designated in the order of the
court.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-28-10.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
30.1-28-10.1. Emergency guardian.
1. On petition by a person interested in the alleged incapacitated individual's welfare, the court
may appoint an emergency guardian if the court finds that compliance with the procedures of
this chapter likely will result in substantial harm to the alleged incapacitated individual's health,
safety, or welfare, and that no other person appears to have authority and willingness to act in
the circumstances. The court may appoint the guardian for a specified period of time, not to
exceed ninety days. Immediately upon receipt of the petition for an emergency guardianship,
the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to advocate for the best interests of the alleged
incapacitated individual in the proceeding and any subsequent proceeding. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection 2, reasonable notice of the time and place of a hearing on
the petition must be given to the alleged incapacitated individual, the individual's spouse, if
any, and any other person as the court directs The court shall hold a hearing within ten days o f
the filing of the petition to determine if appointment of an emergency guardian is appropriate.
2. An emergency guardian may be appointed without notice to the alleged incapacitated
individual and the alleged incapacitated individual's guardian ad litem only if the court finds
from affidavit or other sworn testimony that the alleged incapacitated individual will be
substantially harmed before a hearing on the appointment can be held. If the court appoints an
emergency guardian without notice to the alleged incapacitated individual, the alleged
incapacitated individual and the individual's spouse, if any, and any other person the court
directs must be given notice of the appointment within forty-eight hours after the appointment.
The court shall hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the appointment within ten days after
the appointment.
3. If a conservator has not been appointed for the alleged incapacitated individual and the
emergency guardian has authority for financial decisionmaking, the court's order of
appointment must state that the guardian shall safeguard any assets held by the alleged
incapacitated individual and, during the period of appointment and subject to any further order

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 13
of the court, may expend the individual's assets only for the necessary support and care of the
individual.
4. Appointment of an emergency guardian, with or without notice, is not a determination of the
alleged incapacitated individual's incapacity.
5. The court may remove an emergency guardian at any time. An emergency guardian shall
make any report the court requires. In all other respects, the provisions of this chapter
concerning guardians apply to an emergency guardian.
6. The petitioner may request the court extend the emergency order for up to an additional ninety
days upon good cause shown. The request must be filed with the court at least fourteen days
before the expiration of the emergency order and served on the alleged incapacitated
individual, the individual's spouse, if any, and any other persons as the court directs. The court
shall hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the extension within ten days of the request. No
additional extensions of the emergency guardianship may be granted.
SECTION 14. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-28-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
30.1-28-12. (5-312) General powers and duties of guardian.
1. A guardian of an incapacitated person has only the powers and duties specified by the court.
2. To the extent that it is consistent with the terms of an order by a court of competent
jurisdiction, the guardian is entitled to custody of the person of the ward and may establish the
ward's place of residence within or without this state. However, no guardian may voluntarily
admit a ward to a mental health facility or state institution for a period of more than forty-five
days without a mental health commitment proceeding or other court order. Notwithstanding the
other provisions of this subsection, the guardian may readmit a ward to a mental health facility
or a state institution within sixty days of discharge from that institution, if the original admission
to the facility or institution had been authorized by the court.
3. If entitled to custody of the ward, the guardian should make provision for the care, comfort,
and maintenance of the ward and, whenever appropriate, arrange for the ward's training,
education, or habilitative services. The guardian shall take reasonable care of the ward's
clothing, furniture, vehicles, and personal effects.
4. Notwithstanding general or limited authority to make medical decisions on behalf of the ward,
no guardian may consent to psychosurgery, abortion, sterilization, or experimental treatment
of any kind unless the procedure is first approved by order of the court.
5. When exercising the authority granted by the court, the guardian shall safeguard the civil
rights and personal autonomy of the ward to the fullest extent possible by:
a. Meeting with the ward following the hearing, unless the ward is represented by an
attorney, and explaining to the fullest extent possible the contents of the court's order and
the extent of the guardian's authority;
b. Involving the ward as fully as is practicable in making decisions with respect to the ward's
living arrangements, health care, and other aspects of the ward's care; and
c. Ensuring the ward's maximum personal freedom by using the least restrictive forms of
intervention and only as necessary for the safety of the ward or others.
6. If no conservator for the estate of the ward has been appointed and if the guardian has been
granted authority to make financial decisions on behalf of the ward, the guardian shall:

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 14
a. Institute proceedings to compel any person under a duty to support the ward or to pay
sums for the welfare of the ward to perform that duty.
b. Receive money and tangible property deliverable to the ward and apply the money and
property for support, care, and education of the ward; but, the guardian may not use
funds from the ward's estate for room and board which the guardian or the guardian's
spouse, parent, or child have furnished the ward unless a charge for the service is
approved by order of the court made upon notice to at least one of the next of kin of the
ward, if notice is possible those identified in section 12 of this Ac t. The guardian shall
exercise care to conserve any excess for the ward's needs.
c. Move the court under section 30.1-28-03.2 for authority to sell, mortgage, or otherwise
encumber or transfer ownership or beneficiary of:
(1) The real property of the ward; or
(2) The personal property of the ward valued over two thousand five hundred dollars
upon such terms as the court may order, for the purpose of paying the ward's debts;
providing for the care, maintenance, rehabilitation, training, or education of the ward
or the ward's dependents; or for any other purpose which is in the best interests of
the ward. The sale, mortgage, or other encumbrance or transfer of ownership of
personal property of the ward valued at two thousand five hundred dollars or less
does not require a court order.
d. Move the court under section 30.1-28-03.2 for authority to lease the real or personal
property of the ward.
e. A guardian may not purchase, lease, or obtain ownership or become the beneficiary of
property of the ward unless the price and manner of the sale are approved by the court.
7. If a conservator has been appointed, all of the ward's estate received by the guardian in
excess of those funds expended to meet current expenses for support, care, and education of
the ward must be paid to the conservator for management as provided in this title, and the
guardian must account to the conservator for funds expended.
8. A guardian shall file an annual report with the court regarding the exercise of powers and
duties in areas of authority specified in the court's order of appointment. The report must
describe the status or condition of the ward, including any change of residence and reasons
for the change, any medical treatment received by or withheld from the ward, any expenditure
and income affecting the ward, any sale or transfer of property affecting the ward, and any
exercise of legal authority by the guardian affecting the ward. The report must include
changes that have occurred since the previous reporting period and an accounting of the
ward's estate. The guardian also shall report whether the ward continues to require
guardianship and whether any powers of the guardian should be increased or limited. The
report must be filed with the clerk of district court. The filing of the report does not constitute
an adjudication or a determination of the merits of the report nor does the filing of the report
constitute the court's approval of the report. The court may approve a report and allow and
settle an accounting only upon notice to the ward's guardian ad litem and other interested
persons who have made an appearance or requested notice of proceedings. The office of the
state court administrator shall provide printed forms that may be used to fulfill reporting
requirements. Any report must be similar in substance to the state court administrator's form.
The forms must be available in the office of clerk of district court or obtainable through the
supreme court's internet website.
9. Copies of the guardian's annual report to the court and of any other reports required by the
court must be mailed to the ward and any interested persons designated by the court in its
order those identified in section 12 of this Ac t. The ward's copy must be accompanied by a

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 15
statement, printed with not less than double-spaced twelve-point type, of the ward's right to
seek alteration, limitation, or termination of the guardianship at any time.
10. The guardian is entitled to receive reasonable sums for services and for room and board
furnished to the ward as approved by the court or as agreed upon between the guardian and
the conservator, provided the amounts agreed upon are reasonable under the circumstances.
The guardian may request the conservator to expend the ward's estate by payment to third
persons or institutions for the ward's care and maintenance.
11. A guardian has a fiduciary duty to the ward and may be held liable for a breach of that duty.
12. A guardian is not liable for the acts of the ward, unless the guardian is grossly negligent as
defined in section 1 - 01 - 17 .
13. A guardian is not required to expend personal funds on behalf of the ward solely by reason of
the guardian relationship.
14. A guardian who exercises reasonable care in selecting an individual to provide medical or
other care, treatment, or service for the ward is not liable for injury to the ward resulting from
the wrongful conduct of the individual.
SECTION 15. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-28-12.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
30.1-28-12.1. Annual reports and accounts - Failure of guardian to file.
If a guardian fails to file an annual report as required by section 30.1-28-12, fails to file a report at
other times as the court may direct, or fails to provide an accounting of an estate, the court, upon its
own motion or upon petition of any interested partyperson, may issue an order compelling the guardian
to show cause why the guardian should not immediately make and file the report or account, or be
found in contempt for failure to comply.
SECTION 16. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-28-12.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
30.1-28-12.2. Restrictions on visitation, communication, and interaction with the ward -
Removal of restriction.
1. If it is in the best interests of the ward, a guardian may restrict visitation, communication, and
interaction with the ward.
2. A family member, friend, the ward, clergy member, attorney, agency charged with the
protection of vulnerable adults, or other interested person may move the court to remove the
restriction on visitation, communication, and interaction with the ward.
3. The motion must state:
a. The movant's relationship to the ward;
b. Whether the guardian is unreasonably or arbitrarily denying or restricting visitation,
communication, or interaction between the restricted party and the ward; and
c. The facts supporting the movant's allegation that the guardian is unreasonably or
arbitrarily denying or restricting visitation, communication, or interaction between the
restricted party and the ward.
4. The movant shall serve the motion on the guardian, the ward, the ward's spouse, and any
other interested person those identified in section 12 of this Ac t.

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 16
5. The court shall set a hearing on the motion and provide notice of the hearing to the movant,
the guardian, the ward, the ward's spouse, and any other interested person and those
identified in section 12 of this Ac t.
6. The court shall take into consideration the ward's wishes, and may conduct an in-camera
interview with the ward and appoint a visitor or guardian ad litem.
7. If the court grants the motion for visitation, communication, or interaction, the court may
impose conditions on visitation, communication, and interaction between the restricted party
and the ward.
8. If the visitation, communication, or interaction is not in the best interests of the ward, the court
may prohibit visitation, communication, or interaction between the restricted party and the
ward.
9. The court may award reasonable costs and attorney's fees to the prevailing party if the court
finds:
a. The guardian unreasonably, arbitrarily, or in bad faith denied or restricted visitation,
communication, or interaction between the restricted party and the ward; or
b. The motion was frivolous.
10. Costs and attorney's fees awarded against the guardian may not be paid from the ward's
estate.
11. If a movant for visitation, communication, and interaction states the ward's health is in
significant decline or the ward's death may be imminent, the court shall conduct an emergency
hearing on the motion as soon as practicable but not later than fourteen days after the date
the motion is filed or at a later date upon a showing of good cause.
SECTION 17. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-29-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
30.1-29-05. (5-405) Notice.
1. On a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order, the petitioning party
shall cause notice of the proceeding to be served personally on the person to be protected and the
spouse of the person to be protected or, if none, the parents of the person to be protected, or any
guardian or conservator, at least fourteen days before the date of hearing. If none of these parties can
be found, any government agency paying benefits to the person sought to be protected, if the person
seeking the appointment has knowledge of the existence of these benefits, must be given notice in
accordance with section 30.1-03-01.
2. Notice of a petition for appointment of a conservator or other initial protective order, and of any
subsequent hearing, must be given to any person who has filed a request for notice under
section 30.1-29-06 and to interested persons and other persons as the court may direct.
Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1, notice shall be given in accordance with section
30.1-03-01.
SECTION 18. A new section to chapter 30.1-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Notices in conservatorship proceedings subsequent to appointment.
Notice in a conservatorship proceeding subsequent to appointment of a conservator must be given
to the parties, the guardian, if any, the individual in need of protection, and any interested persons
designated by the court.

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 17
SECTION 19. AMENDMENT. Subsection 6 of section 30.1-29-07 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
6. After hearing, upon finding that the appointment of a conservator or other protective order is
appropriate, the court shall make an appointment or other appropriate protective order. The
court, guardian ad litem, petitioner, or person to be protected may subpoena the individual
who prepared and submitted the report to appear, testify, and be cross-examined. After the
hearing, the guardian ad litem and expert examiner must be discharged of the duties as
guardian ad litem and expert examiner.
SECTION 20. A new section to chapter 30.1-29 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Confidentiality - Reports - Personal information.
1. A written report prepared and submitted by a guardian ad litem or expert examiner and annual
and final reports and financial accounting prepared and submitted by a conservator are closed
to the public and are not open to inspection except by the court, parties to the proceeding or
the parties' counsel, other persons for those purposes as the court may order for good cause,
and others authorized by court rule.
2. Any medical, psychological, or other treatment information protected by federal law or
regulation, and any financial account numbers related to a protected person or proposed
protected person are confidential and may not be disclosed except to parties to the
proceeding, the parties' counsel, and others authorized by court rule. The court may permit
access by other persons for good cause.
SECTION 21. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 30.1-29-08 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. The court has the following powers which may be exercised directly or through a conservator,
subject to section 30.1-29-22, in respect to the estate and affairs of protected persons:
a. While a petition for appointment of a conservator or other protective order is pending and
after preliminary hearing and without prior notice to others, the court has power to
preserve and apply the property of the person to be protected as may be required for the
benefit of the person to be protected or the benefit of the dependents of the person to be
protected.
b. After hearing and upon determining that a basis for an appointment or other protective
order exists with respect to a minor, the court has all those powers over the estate and
affairs of the minor which are or might be necessary for the best interests of the minor,
the minor's family, and members of the minor's household.
c. After hearing and upon determining that appointment of a conservator or other protective
order is appropriate with respect to a person for reasons other than minority, the court
has, for the benefit of the person and members of the person's household, all the powers
over the person's estate and affairs which the person could exercise if present and not
under disability, except the power to make a will. These powers include power to make
gifts, to convey or release the person's contingent and expectant interests in property,
including marital property rights and any right of survivorship incident to joint tenancy, to
exercise or release the person's powers as trustee, personal representative, custodian
for minors, conservator, or donee of a power of appointment, to enter into contracts, to
create revocable or irrevocable trusts of property of the estate which may extend beyond
the person's disability or life, to exercise options of the disabled person to purchase
securities or other property, to exercise the person's rights to elect options and change
beneficiaries under insurance and annuity policies and to surrender the policies for their
cash value, to exercise the person's right to an elective share in the estate of the

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 18
person's deceased spouse, and to renounce any interest by testate or intestate
succession or by inter vivos transfer.
d. The court may exercise or direct the exercise of its authority to exercise or release
powers of appointment of which the protected person is donee, to renounce interests, to
make gifts in trust or otherwise exceeding twenty percent of any year's income of the
estate, or to change beneficiaries under insurance and annuity policies, only if satisfied,
after notice to those identified in section 18 of this Ac t and hearing, that it is in the best
interests of the protected person, and that the protected person either is incapable of
consenting or has consented to the proposed exercise of power.
e. An order made pursuant to this section determining that appointment of a conservator or
other protective order is appropriate has no effect on the capacity of the protected
person.
SECTION 22. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-29-13 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
30.1-29-13. (5-413) Acceptance of appointment - Consent to jurisdiction.
By accepting appointment, a conservator submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any
proceeding, relating to the estate, that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice of any
proceeding shall be delivered to the conservator, or mailed to the conservator by registered or certified
mail at the conservator's address as listed in the petition for appointment or as thereafter reported to the
court and to the conservator's address as then known to the petitioner.
SECTION 23. AMENDMENT. Section 30.1-29-18 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
30.1-29-18. (5-418) Inventory and records.
Within ninety days after appointment, every conservator shall prepare and file with the appointing
court a complete inventory of the estate of the protected person together with the conservator's oath or
affirmation that it is complete and accurate so far as the conservator is informed. The conservator shall
provide a copy thereof to the protected person if the protected person can be located, has attained the
age of fourteen years, and has sufficient mental capacity to understand these matters, and to any
guardian, spouse, or parent, if the protected person is a minor, and to any interested persons
designated by the court in its order to those identified in section 18 of this Ac t. The conservator shall
keep suitable records of the conservator's administration and exhibit the same on request of any
interested person.
SECTION 24. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 30.1-29-19 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. Copies of the conservator's annual report to the court and of any other reports required by the
court must be mailed by the conservator to the protected person and other parties as required
under section 30.1-29-18 provided to those identified in section 18 of this Ac t. The protected
person's copy must be accompanied by a statement, printed with not less than double-spaced
twelve-point type, of the protected person's right to seek alteration, limitation, or termination of
the conservatorship at any time.
SECTION 25. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 30.1-29-20.1 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. On petition by a person interested in the estate of the person to be protected, the court may
appoint an emergency conservator if the court finds that compliance with the procedures in
this chapter likely will result in substantial harm to the estate of the person to be protected,
and that no other person appears to have authority and willingness to act in the

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 19
circumstances. The court may appoint the conservator for a specified period of time, not to
exceed ninety days. Immediately upon receipt of the petition for an emergency conservator,
the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to advocate for the best interests of the estate of
the person to be protected in the proceeding and any subsequent proceeding. The court shall
hold a hearing within ten days of the filing of the petition to determine if appointment of an
emergency conservator is appropriate. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
reasonable notice of the time and place of a hearing on the petition must be given to the
person whose estate is to be protected, the person's spouse, if any, and any other persons as
the court directs those identified in section 18 of this Ac t.
SECTION 26. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 30.1-29-22 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. A conservator shall move the court for authorization to sell real property of the person to be
protected, upon such terms as the court may order, for the purpose of paying the protected
person's debts; providing for the care, maintenance, rehabilitation, training, or education of the
person to be protected or the dependents of the person to be protected; or for any other
purpose in the best interests of the person to be protected.
a. The motion must contain:
(1) A description of the property;
(2) The details of the sale;
(3) The reason for the transaction;
(4) The current fair market value of the property, including an appraisal unless good
cause is shown;
(5) An explanation of why the transaction is in the best interest of the person to be
protected; and
(6) A notice that any person interested in the real property of the person to be protected
must file an objection to the transaction within ten days of the notice and demand a
hearing.
b. The motion must be served upon the protected person, the spouse of the person to be
protected, and all interested persons those identified in section 18 of this Ac t.
c. Consent of the spouse of the person to be protected or interested persons must be filed
with the motion. If the motion is unopposed, the court may authorize the transaction
without a hearing or may conduct a hearing and require proof of the matters necessary to
support the authorization of the transaction.
d. The court's order must include specific findings regarding whether the transaction is in
the best interests of the person to be protected.
SECTION 27. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 30.1-29-25 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
5. If a protected person dies, the conservator shall deliver to the court for safekeeping any will of
the deceased protected person which may have come into the conservator's possession,
inform the executor or a beneficiary named therein that the conservator has done so, and
retain the estate for delivery to a duly appointed personal representative of the decedent or
other persons entitled thereto. If after forty days from the death of the protected person no
other person has been appointed personal representative and no application or petition for
appointment is before the court, the conservator may apply to exercise the powers and duties
of a personal representative so that the conservator may proceed to administer and distribute

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 20
the decedent's estate without additional or further appointment. Upon application for an order
granting the powers of a personal representative to a conservator, after notice to any person
demanding notice under section 30.1-13-04 , those identified in section 18 of this Act , and to
any person nominated executor in any will of which the applicant is aware, the court may order
the conferral of the power upon determining that there is no objection, and endorse the letters
of the conservator to note that the formerly protected person is deceased and that the
conservator has acquired all of the powers and duties of a personal representative. The
making and entry of an order under this section has the effect of an order of appointment of a
personal representative as provided in section 30.1-14-08 and chapters 30.1-17 through
30.1-21, except that estate in the name of the conservator, after administration, may be
distributed to the decedent's successors without prior retransfer to the conservator as
personal representative.
SECTION 28. REPEAL. Sections 30.1-26-01, 30.1-28-08, and 30.1-28-15 of the North Dakota
Century Code are repealed.

S. B. NO. 2291 - PAGE 21
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2291.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State